Hawaii statutes.
[§198-3] Holders. Any public body and
any organization which qualifies for and holds an income tax exemption under
section 501(c) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, and
whose organizational purposes are designed to facilitate the purposes of this
chapter, may acquire and hold conservation easements by purchase, agreement,
donation, devise, or bequest, but not by eminent domain. [L 1985, c 149, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next